Florida, session 2026, SB166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 48 49 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 50 381.0051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 51 381.0051âFamily planning.â 52 (4)âMINORS; PROVISION OF MATERNAL HEALTH AND CONTRACEPTIVE 53 INFORMATION AND SERVICES.â 54 (a)âMaternal health and contraceptive information and 55 services of a nonsurgical nature may be rendered to any minor by 56 persons licensed to practice medicine under the provisions of 57 chapter 458 or chapter 459, as well as by the Department of 58 Health through its family planning program, provided the minor: 59 1.âIs married; 60 2.âIs a parent; 61 3.âIs pregnant; or 62 4.âHas the consent of a parent or legal guardian; or 63 5.âMay, in the opinion of the physician, suffer probable 64 health hazards if such services are not provided. 65 Section 2.âSection 384.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to 66 read: 67 384.30âMinorsâ consent to treatment.â 68 (1)âThe department and its authorized representatives, each 69 physician licensed to practice medicine under the provisions of 70 chapter 458 or chapter 459, each health care professional 71 licensed under the provisions of part I of chapter 464 who is 72 acting pursuant to the scope of his or her license, and each 73 public or private hospital, clinic, or other health facility may 74 examine and provide treatment for sexually transmissible 75 diseases to any minor, if the physician, health care 76 professional, or facility is qualified to provide such 77 examination and treatment. The consent of a parent the parents 78 or guardian guardians of a minor is not a prerequisite for an 79 examination; however, the consent of a parent or guardian is 80 required for or treatment. 81 (2)âThe fact of consultation, examination, and treatment of 82 a minor for a sexually transmissible disease is confidential and 83 exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and may shall not be 84 divulged in any direct or indirect manner, such as sending a 85 bill for a consultation or examination services rendered to a 86 parent or guardian, except as provided in s. 384.29. 87 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 88 394.459, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 89 394.459âRights of patients.â 90 (3)âRIGHT TO EXPRESS AND INFORMED PATIENT CONSENT.â 91 (a)1.âEach patient entering treatment shall be asked to 92 give express and informed consent for admission or treatment. If 93 the patient has been adjudicated incapacitated or found to be 94 incompetent to consent to treatment, express and informed 95 consent to treatment shall be sought instead from the patientâs 96 guardian or guardian advocate. If the patient is a minor, 97 express and informed consent for admission or treatment shall 98 also be requested from the patientâs guardian. Express and 99 informed consent for admission or treatment of a patient under 100 18 years of age shall be required from the patientâs guardian, 101 unless the minor is seeking outpatient crisis intervention 102 services under s. 394.4784. Express and informed consent for 103 admission or treatment given by a patient who is under 18 years 104 of age shall not be a condition of admission when the patientâs 105 guardian gives express and informed consent for the patientâs 106 admission pursuant to s. 394.463 or s. 394.467. 107 2.âBefore giving express and informed consent, the 108 following information shall be provided and explained in plain 109 language to the patient, or to the patientâs guardian if the 110 patient is 18 years of age or older and has been adjudicated 111 incapacitated, or to the patientâs guardian advocate if the 112 patient has been found to be incompetent to consent to 113 treatment, or to both the patient and the guardian if the 114 patient is a minor: the reason for admission or treatment; the 115 proposed treatment; the purpose of the treatment to be provided; 116 the common risks, benefits, and side effects thereof; the 117 specific dosage range for the medication, when applicable; 118 alternative treatment modalities; the approximate length of 119 care; the potential effects of stopping treatment; how treatment 120 will be monitored; and that any consent given for treatment may 121 be revoked orally or in writing before or during the treatment 122 period by the patient or by a person who is legally authorized 123 to make health care decisions on behalf of the patient. 124 Section 4.âSection 394.4784, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 125 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 126 394.495, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 127 394.495âChild and adolescent mental health system of care; 128 programs and services.â 129 (7) 130 (b)âA mobile response team shall, at a minimum: 131 1.âTriage new requests to determine the level of severity 132 and prioritize new requests that meet the clinical threshold for 133 an in-person response. To the extent permitted by available 134 resources, mobile response teams must provide in-person 135 responses to such calls meeting such clinical level of response 136 within 60 minutes after prioritization. 137 2.âRespond to a crisis in the location where the crisis is 138 occurring. 139 3.âProvide behavioral health crisis-oriented services that 140 are responsive to the needs of the child, adolescent, or young 141 adult and his or her family. 142 4.âProvide evidence-based practices to children, 143 adolescents, young adults, and families to enable them to de 144 escalate and respond to behavioral challenges that they are 145 facing and to reduce the potential for future crises. 146 5.âProvide screening, standardized assessments, early 147 identification, and referrals to community services. 148 6.âProvide care coordination by facilitating the transition 149 to ongoing services. 150 7.âEnsure there is a process in place for informed consent 151 and confidentiality compliance measures. Consent of a parent or 152 guardian is required for services provided by the mobile 153 response team after the immediate, onsite behavioral health 154 crisis services, including, but not limited to, the provision of 155 additional evidence-based services subsequent to the crisis 156 event, referrals to community services, and care coordination. 157 8.âPromote information sharing and the use of innovative 158 technology. 159 9.âCoordinate with the applicable managing entity to 160 establish informal partnerships with key entities providing 161 behavioral health services and supports to children, 162 adolescents, or young adults and their families to facilitate 163 continuity of care. 164 Section 6.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 397.431, 165 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 166 397.431âIndividual responsibility for cost of substance 167 abuse impairment services.â 168 (1)âBefore accepting an individual for admission and in 169 accordance with confidentiality guidelines, both the full charge 170 for services and the fee charged to the individual for such 171 services under the providerâs fee system or payment policy must 172 be disclosed to each individual or his or her authorized 173 personal representative, or parent or legal guardian if the 174 individual is a minor who did not seek treatment voluntarily and 175 without parental consent. 176 (3)âThe parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian of a 177 minor is not liable for payment for any substance abuse services 178 provided to the minor without parental consent pursuant to s. 179 397.601(4), unless the parent, legal guardian, or legal 180 custodian participates or is ordered to participate in the 181 services, and only for the substance abuse services rendered. If 182 the minor is receiving services as a juvenile offender, the 183 obligation to pay is governed by the law relating to juvenile 184 offenders. 185 Section 7.âParagraph (e) of subsection (7) of section 186 397.501, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 187 397.501âRights of individuals.âIndividuals receiving 188 substance abuse services from any service provider are 189 guaranteed protection of the rights specified in this section, 190 unless otherwise expressly provided, and service providers must 191 ensure the protection of such rights. 192 (7)âRIGHT TO CONFIDENTIALITY OF INDIVIDUAL RECORDS.â 193 (e)1.âSince a minor acting alone has the legal capacity to 194 voluntarily apply for and obtain substance abuse treatment, any 195 written consent for disclosure may be given only by the minor. 196 This restriction includes, but is not limited to, any disclosure 197 of identifying information to the parent, legal guardian, or 198 custodian of a minor for the purpose of obtaining financial 199 reimbursement. 200 2.âWhen the consent of a parent, legal guardian, or 201 custodian is required under this chapter in order for a minor to 202 obtain substance abuse treatment, any written consent for 203 disclosure must be given by both the minor and the parent, legal 204 guardian, or custodian. 205 Section 8.âSubsection (4) of section 397.601, Florida 206 Statutes, is amended to read: 207 397.601âVoluntary admissions.â 208 (4)(a)âThe disability of minority for persons under 18 209 years of age is removed solely for the purpose of obtaining 210 voluntary substance abuse impairment services from a licensed 211 service provider, and consent to such services by a minor has 212 the same force and effect as if executed by an individual who 213 has reached the age of majority. Such consent is not subject to 214 later disaffirmance based on minority. 215 (b)âExcept for purposes of law enforcement activities in 216 connection with protective custody, the disability of minority 217 is not removed if there is For an involuntary admission of a 218 minor for substance abuse services, in which case parental 219 participation may be required as the court finds appropriate. 220 Section 9.âParagraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 221 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 222 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 223 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 224 powers and perform all duties listed below: 225 (8)âSTUDENT WELFARE.â 226 (c)1.âIn accordance with the rights of parents enumerated 227 in ss. 1002.20 and 1014.04, adopt procedures for notifying a 228 studentâs parent if there is a change in the studentâs services 229 or monitoring related to the studentâs mental, emotional, or 230 physical health or well-being and the schoolâs ability to 231 provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the 232 student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental right of 233 parents to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control 234 of their children by requiring school district personnel to 235 encourage a student to discuss issues relating to his or her 236 well-being with his or her parent or to facilitate discussion of 237 the issue with the parent. The procedures may not prohibit 238 parents from accessing any of their studentâs education and 239 health records created, maintained, or used by the school 240 district, as required by s. 1002.22(2). 241 2.âA school district may not adopt procedures or student 242 support forms that prohibit school district personnel from 243 notifying a parent about his or her studentâs mental, emotional, 244 or physical health or well-being, or a change in related 245 services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of 246 encouraging a student to withhold from a parent such 247 information. School district personnel may not discourage or 248 prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical 249 decisions affecting a studentâs mental, emotional, or physical 250 health or well-being. This subparagraph does not prohibit a 251 school district from adopting procedures that permit school 252 personnel to withhold such information from a parent if a 253 reasonably prudent person would believe that disclosure would 254 result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect, as those terms are 255 defined in s. 39.01. 256 3.âClassroom instruction by school personnel or third 257 parties on sexual orientation or gender identity may not occur 258 in prekindergarten through grade 8, except when required by ss. 259 1003.42(2)(o)3. and 1003.46. If such instruction is provided in 260 grades 9 through 12, the instruction must be age-appropriate or 261 developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with 262 state standards. This subparagraph applies to charter schools. 263 4.âStudent support services training developed or provided 264 by a school district to school district personnel must adhere to 265 student services guidelines, standards, and frameworks 266 established by the Department of Education. 267 5.âAt the beginning of the school year, each school 268 district shall notify parents of each health care service 269 offered at their studentâs school and the option to withhold 270 consent or decline any specific service in accordance with s. 271 1014.06. Parental consent to a health care service does not 272 waive the parentâs right to access his or her studentâs 273 educational or health records or to be notified about a change 274 in his or her studentâs services or monitoring as provided by 275 this paragraph. 276 6.âExcept as provided in s. 1014.04(1)(k), before 277 administering any a student well-being, mental health, or health 278 screening questionnaire or health screening form to a student in 279 kindergarten through grade 12 3, the school district must 280 provide the questionnaire or health screening form to the 281 parent, either electronically or in paper form, and notify the 282 parent of the date or time period when the questionnaire or form 283 will be administered. The school district must give the parent 284 an opportunity to opt his or her student out of participation 285 and obtain the permission of the parent. 286 7.âEach school district shall adopt procedures for a parent 287 to notify the principal, or his or her designee, regarding 288 concerns under this paragraph at his or her studentâs school and 289 the process for resolving those concerns within 7 calendar days 290 after notification by the parent. 291 a.âAt a minimum, the procedures must require that within 30 292 days after notification by the parent that the concern remains 293 unresolved, the school district must either resolve the concern 294 or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving the 295 concern. 296 b.âIf a concern is not resolved by the school district, a 297 parent may: 298 (I)âRequest the Commissioner of Education to appoint a 299 special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar in good 300 standing and who has at least 5 yearsâ experience in 301 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts 302 relating to the dispute over the school district procedure or 303 practice, consider information provided by the school district, 304 and render a recommended decision for resolution to the State 305 Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request 306 by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve or 307 reject the recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled 308 meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30 309 days after the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The 310 costs of the special magistrate shall be borne by the school 311 district. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, 312 including forms, necessary to implement this subparagraph. 313 (II)âBring an action against the school district to obtain 314 a declaratory judgment that the school district procedure or 315 practice violates this paragraph and seek injunctive relief. A 316 court may award damages and shall award reasonable attorney fees 317 and court costs to a parent who receives declaratory or 318 injunctive relief. 319 c.âEach school district shall adopt and post on its website 320 policies to notify parents of the procedures required under this 321 subparagraph. 322 d.âNothing contained in this subparagraph shall be 323 construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in 324 equity already existing under the common law or general law. 325 Section 10.âParagraphs (e), (f), and (h) of subsection (1) 326 of section 1014.04, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 327 paragraphs (k) and (l) are added to that subsection, to read: 328 1014.04âParental rights.â 329 (1)âAll parental rights are reserved to the parent of a 330 minor child in this state without obstruction or interference 331 from the state, any of its political subdivisions, any other 332 governmental entity, or any other institution, including, but 333 not limited to, all of the following rights of a parent of a 334 minor child in this state: 335 (e)âThe right to make health care decisions for his or her 336 minor child, unless: 337 1.âThe parent is the subject of an investigation of a crime 338 committed against the minor child; 339 2.âThe minor child has been maintained in an out-of-home 340 placement by the Department of Children and Families and the 341 department has the minor child examined for injury, illness, and 342 communicable diseases and to determine the need for 343 immunization; 344 3.âThe minor child is authorized by law to make specific 345 health care decisions for himself or herself as provided in ss. 346 743.01, 743.015, 743.06, 743.065, 743.066, and 743.067; 347 4.âA parent cannot be located and another person is 348 authorized by law to make health care decisions as provided in 349 s. 743.0645; 350 5.âThe minor child is receiving emergency medical care 351 under s. 743.064, involuntary services under s. 394.463 or s. 352 397.675, or immediate, onsite behavioral health crisis services 353 under s. 394.495(7); 354 6.âCircumstances exist which satisfy the requirements of 355 law for a parentâs implied consent to medical care and treatment 356 of the minor child as provided in s. 383.50; or 357 7.âA court order provides otherwise prohibited by law. 358 (f)âThe right to access and review all medical records of 359 his or her minor child, unless prohibited by law or if the 360 parent is the subject of an investigation of a crime committed 361 against the minor child and a law enforcement agency or official 362 requests that the information not be released. 363 (h)âThe right to consent in writing before any record of 364 his or her minor childâs blood or deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is 365 created, stored, or shared, except as required by s. 943.325 or 366 s. 943.326 general law or authorized pursuant to a court order. 367 (k)1.âThe right to review, inspect, and consent to a survey 368 or questionnaire before such survey or questionnaire is given to 369 his or her minor child which may reveal information concerning 370 any of the following: 371 a.âPolitical affiliations or beliefs of the child or the 372 childâs family; 373 b.âMental or psychological problems of the child or the 374 childâs family; 375 c.âSexual behavior or attitudes; 376 d.âIllegal, antisocial, self-incriminating, or demeaning 377 behavior; 378 e.âCritical appraisals of any other individual with whom 379 the child has a close family relationship; 380 f.âLegally recognized privileged or analogous 381 relationships, such as those of lawyers, physicians, and 382 ministers; 383 g.âReligious practices, affiliations, or beliefs of the 384 child or childâs parent; or 385 h.âIncome, other than that required by law to determine 386 eligibility for participation in a program or for receiving 387 financial assistance under such program. 388 2.âThe right to know, at the time consent is provided, the 389 purpose of the survey or questionnaire, how the information will 390 be used, and the extent to which the information will be shared 391 and redisclosed and to whom. 392 393 This paragraph does not apply when a parent does not have the 394 right to make health care decisions for his or her minor child 395 pursuant to paragraph (e). 396 (l)âThe right to consent in writing to the use of a 397 biofeedback device on his or her minor child. As used in this 398 paragraph, the term âbiofeedback deviceâ means an instrument or 399 a sensor used to measure bodily functions, such as heart rate 400 variability, brain waves, or breathing rate, outside of a health 401 care facility or providerâs office, for the purpose of improving 402 performance. If the parent consents to the use of the device, 403 all results must be provided to the parent and must otherwise be 404 held as a confidential medical record. 405 Section 11.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 1014.06, 406 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 407 1014.06âParental consent for health care services.â 408 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in s. 1014.04(1)(e) or by 409 a court order law, a health care practitioner, as defined in s. 410 456.001, or an individual employed by such health care 411 practitioner may not provide or solicit or arrange to provide 412 health care services or prescribe medicinal drugs to a minor 413 child without first obtaining written parental consent. 414 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in s. 1014.04(1)(e) by law 415 or by a court order, a provider, as defined in s. 408.803, may 416 not allow a medical procedure to be performed on a minor child 417 in its facility without first obtaining written parental 418 consent. 419 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 420 made by this act to section 1014.06, Florida Statutes, in a 421 reference thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 422 408.813, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 423 408.813âAdministrative fines; violations.âAs a penalty for 424 any violation of this part, authorizing statutes, or applicable 425 rules, the agency may impose an administrative fine. 426 (3)âThe agency may impose an administrative fine for a 427 violation that is not designated as a class I, class II, class 428 III, or class IV violation. Unless otherwise specified by law, 429 the amount of the fine may not exceed $500 for each violation. 430 Unclassified violations include: 431 (f)âViolating the parental consent requirements of s. 432 1014.06. 433 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 434 made by this act to section 1014.06, Florida Statutes, in a 435 reference thereto, paragraph (rr) of subsection (1) of section 436 456.072, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 437 456.072âGrounds for discipline; penalties; enforcement.â 438 (1)âThe following acts shall constitute grounds for which 439 the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may be 440 taken: 441 (rr)âFailure to comply with the parental consent 442 requirements of s. 1014.06. 443 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.